Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.320

Probationary licenses.

(1) The department may issue a probationary license to a licensee who has had an initial, expiring, or other license but is temporarily unable to comply with a rule or has been the subject of multiple complaints or concerns about noncompliance if:

(a) The noncompliance does not present an immediate threat to the health and well-being of the children but would be likely to do so if allowed to continue; and

(b) The licensee has a plan approved by the department to correct the area of noncompliance within the probationary period.

(2) Before issuing a probationary license, the department shall, in writing, refer the licensee to the child care resource and referral network or other appropriate resource for technical assistance. The department may issue a probationary license pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if within fifteen working days after the department has sent its referral:

(a) The licensee, in writing, has refused the department's referral for technical assistance; or

(b) The licensee has failed to respond in writing to the department's referral for technical assistance.

(3) If the licensee accepts the department's referral for technical assistance issued under subsection (2) of this section, the department, the licensee, and the technical assistance provider shall meet within thirty days after the licensee's acceptance. The licensee and the department, in consultation with the technical assistance provider, shall develop a plan to correct the areas of noncompliance identified by the department. If, after sixty days, the licensee has not corrected the areas of noncompliance identified in the plan developed in consultation with the technical assistance provider, the department may issue a probationary license pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(4) A probationary license may be issued for up to six months, and at the discretion of the department it may be extended for an additional six months. The department shall immediately terminate the probationary license, if at any time the noncompliance for which the probationary license was issued presents an immediate threat to the health or well-being of the children.

(5) The department may, at any time, issue a probationary license for due cause that states the conditions of probation.

(6) An existing license is invalidated when a probationary license is issued.

(7) At the expiration of the probationary license, the department shall reinstate the original license for the remainder of its term, issue a new license, or revoke the original license.

(8) A right to an adjudicative proceeding shall not accrue to the licensee whose license has been placed on probationary status unless the licensee does not agree with the placement on probationary status and the department then suspends, revokes, or modifies the license.

[ 2011 c 297 s 2; 2006 c 265 s 310. Formerly RCW 43.215.290.]